Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.545.110

Rules to effect purposes and implement provisions.

The superintendent of public instruction is hereby empowered to adopt rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, deemed necessary or advisable by the superintendent to effect the purposes and implement the provisions of RCW 28A.545.030 through 28A.545.110 and 84.52.0531.

[ 1990 c 33 s 495; 1981 c 264 s 9. Formerly RCW 28A.44.230.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 264: See note following RCW 28A.545.030.